Hawaii statutes.
§6E-42 Review of proposed projects. (a)
Except as provided in section 6E-42.2, before any agency or officer of the
State or its political subdivisions approves any project involving a permit,
license, certificate, land use change, subdivision, or other entitlement for
use, which may affect historic property, aviation artifacts, or a burial site,
the agency or office shall advise the department and prior to any approval
allow the department an opportunity for review and comment on the effect of the
proposed project on historic properties, aviation artifacts, or burial sites,
consistent with section 6E-43, including those listed in the Hawaii register of
historic places. If:

(1) The proposed project consists of corridors or
large land areas;

(2) Access to properties is restricted; or

(3) Circumstances dictate that construction be done
in stages,

the department's review and comment may be based on
a phased review of the project; provided that there shall be a programmatic
agreement between the department and the project applicant that identifies each
phase and the estimated timelines for each phase.

(b) The department shall inform the public of
any project proposals submitted to it under this section that are not otherwise
subject to the requirement of a public hearing or other public notification.

(c) The department shall adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91 to implement this section. [L 1988, c 265, pt of §1;
am L 1990, c 306, §12; am L 1995, c 187, §3; am L 1996, c 97, §10; am L 2013, c
85, §3; am L 2015, c 224, §3]

Law Journals and Reviews

Ensuring Our Future by Protecting Our Past: An Indigenous
Reconciliation Approach to Improving Native Hawaiian Burial Protection. 33 UH
L. Rev. 321 (2010).

Case Notes

Where rules implementing §6E-8 and this section required that
historic properties be identified in the "project area", and the
broad definition of "project area" contained in the rules encompassed
the entire rail project, the rules did not permit the state historic
preservation division (SHPD) to concur in the rail project absent a completed
archeological inventory survey (AIS) for the entire project area; because an
AIS was not completed before the SHPD gave its concurrence in the project, the
SHPD's concurrence in and the city's commencement of the project were improper.
128 H. 53, 283 P.3d 60 (2012).

The count of plaintiff's amended complaint alleging that
state and county defendants failed to comply with the requirements of chapter
13-284, Hawaii administrative rules, the historic preservation review process,
by allowing the project to advance before the review process was completed, and
by relying on outdated and flawed reports, was ripe for adjudication, where
plaintiff's contentions focused on the failure of defendants to follow the
historic review process, a determination that could be made regardless of
whether the subject road was used as the access point to the development. 131
H. 123, 315 P.3d 749 (2013).

This section requires a permitting agency to seek state
historic preservation division review and comment only when the permitting
agency knows, or has reason to suspect, that the project may impact a burial or
other historic site; where there was no evidence that defendant city department
of planning and permitting knew or should have known that a burial site existed
on the property, the circuit court properly ruled that the city did not violate
this section. 122 H. 171 (App.), 223 P.3d 236 (2009).

As: (1) this section applies to any project "which may
affect historic property ... or a burial site", as defined by §6E-2; (2) a
burial site can be found in a cemetery; and (3) a cemetery can also be a
historic property, as also defined by §6E-2, church building project was not
exempt from the historic preservation review process required by this section
and its implementing rules because the project involved a cemetery. 128 H. 455
(App.), 290 P.3d 525 (2012).

The state historic preservation division (SHPD) violated
chapter 13-284, HAR, its rules implementing this section, by failing to require
the completion of an archaeological inventory survey (AIS); by accepting an
archaeological monitoring plan as a substitute for an AIS, the SHPD skipped to
the mitigation step of the review process and allowed construction on the church
building project to commence without identifying the significant historic
properties at issue and evaluating the impact of the project on them, thereby
limiting the potential options for their protection and preservation. 128 H.
455 (App.), 290 P.3d 525 (2012).

Where the main footprint of the church building project had
not been maintained and actively used as a cemetery for over sixty years and
the church was not in the process of removing or redesignating the project site
as a cemetery when government approval for the project was sought, §6E-43(a),
which excludes human skeletal remains found in a "known, maintained,
actively used cemetery", did not apply to the project; thus, the project
and the burial sites it affected were subject to the requirements of this
section. 128 H. 455 (App.), 290 P.3d 525 (2012).

Where the state historic preservation division (SHPD) did not
make a determination that no historic properties were present or that an
adequate archaeological inventory survey (AIS) existed and that historic
properties were present, thereby allowing for evaluation of the significance of
the historic properties, completion of an AIS was a necessary first step to
replace the church buildings; thus, the SHPD: (1) should have required the
church to complete an AIS before concurring in the church building project; and
(2) violated its own rules by failing to require an AIS before permitting the
project to go forward. 128 H. 455 (App.), 290 P.3d 525 (2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next